Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-165 of Title 37A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement (ABLE) Commission
shall issue multiple licenses for manufacturing beverages on the
same premises if the applicant is in good standing with the ABLE
Commission and the Oklahoma Tax Commission pursuant to the Oklahoma
Alcoholic Beverage Control Act including, but not limited to, small
brewer license, charitable collaboration brewer license, distiller
license, winemaker license, rectifier license, and small farm winery
license and manufacturer's license. Nothing in this section shall
be construed to apply to the issuance of distribution or wholesale
licensee.

B. Applicants for an additional license must obtain all
necessary federal permits and approvals from the Alcohol and Tobacco
Tax and Trade Bureau (TTB) for an alternating proprietorship or
premises arrangement and the applicant must be in good standing with
the TTB. An applicant shall notify the ABLE Commission of its
intention to operate an alternating proprietorship or premises when
applying for the second and all subsequent licenses for a single
premises.
C. Any license holder operating under an alternating
proprietorship or premises arrangement shall abide by the portions
of the Oklahoma Alcoholic Beverage Control Act that are relevant to
the license under which they are producing the corresponding
beverage governed by the license.
D. The ABLE Commission shall promulgate rules, pursuant to the
Administrative Procedures Act, to authorize alternating
proprietorship or premises arrangements.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3501 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3501 Page 3